Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2616
Sales of swine; enforcement of provisions; restraining order.

The Attorney General shall enforce the provisions of sections 54-2607 to 54-2615, and the director shall refer any violations of these provisions to the Attorney General. The Attorney General or any person injured by a violation of these provisions may bring an action in district court to restrain a packer from violating these provisions.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 16.